Arkansas, session 2025, HR1001.
Be it
enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas.” (Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 19 - Style of laws -- Enacting Clause.)
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
38.(i) The General Assembly of Arkansas shall not pass any local or
special act. This amendment shall not prohibit the repeal of local or
special acts. (Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 14 - Local Acts.)
38.(j) No bill shall be passed by either house containing more than
one subject, which shall be expressed in the title, and the subtitle. Rule 4
of the Joint Rules of the Senate and House of Representatives - Contents of
Bills
38.(k) In making appropriations for any fiscal year, the General
Assembly shall first pass the General Appropriation Bill provided for in
Section 30 of Article 5 of the Constitution, and no other appropriation bill
may be enacted before that shall have been done. (Arkansas Constitution,
Article 5, § 40 - General appropriation bill -- Enactment.
38.(l) No money shall be drawn from the treasury except in pursuance
of specific appropriation made by law, the purpose of which shall be
distinctly stated in the bill, and the maximum amount which may be drawn
shall be specified in dollars and cents; and no appropriation shall be for a
longer period than one (1) fiscal year. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5,
§ 29 - Appropriations.)
The general appropriation bill shall embrace nothing but appropriations
for the ordinary expense of the executive, legislative and judicial
departments of the State; all other appropriations shall be made by separate
bills, each embracing but one (1) subject. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5,
§ 30 - General and special appropriations.)
No state tax shall be allowed, or appropriation of money made, except
to raise means for the payment of the just debts of the State, for defraying
the necessary expenses of government, to sustain common schools, to repel
invasion and suppress insurrection, except by a majority of two-thirds (2/3)
of both houses of the General Assembly. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5,
§ 31 - Purposes of taxes and appropriations.)
None of the rates for property, excise, privilege or personal taxes,
now levied shall be increased by the General Assembly except after the
approval of the qualified electors voting thereon at an election, or in case
of emergency, by the votes of three-fourths (3/4) of the members elected to
each House of the General Assembly. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5,
§ 38 - Taxes -- Increase -- Approval by electors.)
Excepting monies raised or collected for educational purposes, highway
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
purposes, to pay Confederate pensions and the just debts of the State, the
General Assembly is hereby prohibited from appropriating or expending more
than the sum of Two and One-Half Million Dollars for all purposes, for any
fiscal year; provided the limit herein fixed may be exceeded by the votes of
three-fourths (3/4) of the members elected to each House of the General
Assembly. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 39 - State expenses -
- Limitation -- Exceptions.)
38.(m)(1) No appropriation bill shall be filed for introduction in
either the House of Representatives or the Senate later than the fiftieth
(50th) day of a regular session except upon consent of two-thirds (2/3) of
the members elected to each house.
(2)(A) No appropriation bill shall be filed for introduction in
either the House of Representatives or the Senate later than the fifteenth
(15th) day of a fiscal session except upon consent of two-thirds (2/3) of the
members elected to each house.
(B) For a fiscal session, a non-appropriation bill shall
not be filed for introduction until identical resolutions authorizing the
introduction of the non-appropriation bill have been approved by an
affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members elected to each house.
(C) The identical resolutions authorizing the introduction
of a non-appropriation bill in a fiscal session shall not be filed for
introduction in either the House of Representatives or the Senate later than
the first (1st) day of a fiscal session.
(D) A non-appropriation bill shall not be filed for
introduction in either the House of Representatives or the Senate later than
the fifteenth (15th) day of a fiscal session.
(3) When the filing deadline for any bills or resolutions ends
on Saturday or Sunday, the deadline is extended until the close of business
the following Monday.
38.(n)(1) No resolution proposing a constitutional amendment shall be
filed in the House of Representatives after the thirty-first (31st) day of
each regular session of the General Assembly. Proposed constitutional
amendments may only be considered during regular sessions.
(2) All resolutions proposing constitutional amendments shall be
referred to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs,
which by an affirmative vote of its members may recommend proposals one-at-a-
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
time to the House of Representatives for its consideration.
(3) Any proposed constitutional amendment initiated in and
approved by the House of Representatives shall be transmitted to the Senate
for its consideration. If the Senate fails to approve a House-proposed
constitutional amendment, the House of Representatives may proceed to
initiate other proposed constitutional amendments one-at-a-time for Senate
consideration.
(4) Any proposed constitutional amendment received from the
Senate shall be referred to the House Committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs, which by an affirmative vote of its members may
recommend the proposal to the House of Representatives for its consideration.
(5) Upon adoption by the General Assembly of a House-proposed
constitutional amendment and a Senate-proposed constitutional amendment, in
accordance with the Joint Rules, a third proposed constitutional amendment
may be considered and voted upon by the General Assembly only after identical
resolutions authorizing the consideration of the third proposed
constitutional amendment have been approved by an affirmative vote of two-
thirds (2/3) of the members elected to each house.
38.(o)(1) Any proposed legislation affecting any publicly supported
retirement system or pension plan to be considered by the General Assembly at
a regular session shall be introduced in the General Assembly during the
first fifteen (15) calendar days of a regular session. (Arkansas Code § 10-2-
115, Introduction of bills affecting public retirement programs.)
(2) No such bill shall be introduced after the fifteenth day of
a regular session unless its introduction is first approved by a three-
fourths (3/4) vote of the full membership of each House of the General
Assembly. (Arkansas Code § 10-2-115, Introduction of bills affecting public
retirement programs.)
(3) A bill affecting any publicly supported retirement system or
systems shall not be introduced or considered at any special session or
fiscal session of the General Assembly unless the introduction and
consideration of the bill is first approved by a three-fourths (3/4) vote of
the full membership of each House of the General Assembly. (Arkansas Code
§ 10-2-115, Introduction of bills affecting public retirement programs.)
38.(p)(1) A bill affecting the State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program or that imposes a new or increased cost obligation for
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an entity of the state
on the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program to be
considered by the General Assembly at a regular session shall be introduced
in the General Assembly during the first fifteen (15) calendar days of a
regular session.
(2)(A) A bill affecting the State and Public School Life
and Health Insurance Program or that imposes a new or increased cost
obligation for health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an
entity of the state on the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance
Program shall not be introduced after the fifteenth day of a regular session
unless the introduction of the bill is first approved by a three-fourths
(3/4) vote of the full membership of each house of the General Assembly.
(B) If the General Assembly recesses for longer than
three (3) consecutive days during the first fifteen (15) calendar days of a
regular session, the fifteen-day introduction deadline shall be extended for
a time period equal to the recess.
(3) A bill affecting the State and Public School Life and
Health Insurance Program or that imposes a new or increased cost obligation
for health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an entity of the
state on the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program shall
not be introduced or considered at a fiscal session or an extraordinary
session of the General Assembly unless the introduction and consideration of
the bill is first approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the full membership
of each house of the General Assembly.
38.(q)(1) The following proposed legislation to be considered by the
General Assembly at a regular session shall be introduced in the General
Assembly during the first thirty-one (31) calendar days of a regular session:
(A) A bill that creates a new scholarship to be funded
with net proceeds from the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund
Account, as applicable; and
(B) A bill that affects an existing scholarship that is
funded with net proceeds from the state lottery or the Higher Education
Grants Fund Account, as applicable.
(2)(A) A bill creating a new scholarship to be funded with net
proceeds from the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account,
as applicable, or affecting an existing scholarship that is funded with net
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
proceeds from the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account,
as applicable, shall not be introduced after the thirty-first day of a
regular session unless its introduction is first approved by a three-fourths
(3/4) vote of the full membership of each chamber of the General Assembly.
(B) If the General Assembly recesses for longer than three
(3) consecutive days during the first thirty-one (31) days of a regular
session, the deadline imposed under this section shall be extended for a time
period equal to the recess.
(3) A bill creating a new scholarship to be funded with net
proceeds from the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account,
as applicable, or affecting an existing scholarship that is funded with net
proceeds from the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account,
as applicable, shall not be introduced or considered at a special session or
fiscal session of the General Assembly unless the introduction or
consideration of the bill is first approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the
full membership of each chamber of the General Assembly.
38.(r) “Fiscal impact statement” means a realistic statement of the
estimated financial cost of implementing or complying with a proposed law
regarding:
(1) Municipalities;
(2) Counties;
(3) Education, as related to the State of Arkansas and local
school districts grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12);
(4) Corrections, if imposing new or additional costs and
restrictions on inmate population patterns or affecting programs or services
of the Department of Correction;
(5) Lottery, if amending Arkansas Code, Title 23, Chapter 115 or
imposing a new or increased cost to the Office of the Arkansas Lottery or a
lottery;
(6) Health benefit plans, if imposing a new or increased cost
obligation for health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an
entity of the state Imposing a new or increased cost on the State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program; or
(7) New or existing scholarships to be funded with net proceeds
from the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account, as
applicable.
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
38.(s) When any House or Senate bill requiring an expenditure of public
funds or otherwise imposing a new or increased cost obligation is pending
before any committee of the House of Representatives, any member of the
committee may request that a fiscal impact statement for such bill be placed
on the desk of each member of the committee before the bill is called up for
final action in the committee. If such request is made, the chairperson of
the committee shall refer the bill to the appropriate state agency or to the
legislative staff for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement, to be
returned to the committee in writing not later than five (5) days from the
date of the request.
38.(t) Any time before a bill requiring an expenditure of public funds
or otherwise imposing a new or increased cost obligation is read for the
third time in the House of Representatives, any member of the House may
request and the Speaker shall direct that a fiscal impact statement for the
bill be prepared and placed on the desk of each member not later than five
(5) days from the date of the request.
38.(u) Fiscal impact statements shall be made available to House
Committees:
(1) At least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for
final action in the House Committee during a regular legislative session or
fiscal session of the General Assembly; and
(2) At least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for
final action in the House Committee during a special session of the General
Assembly.
Fiscal impact statements shall be made available to the full House of
Representatives at least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for
third reading and final action in the House of Representatives.
38.(v)(1) Except for bills imposing a new or increased cost obligation
for health benefit plans on an entity of the state on the State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program or bills regarding new or existing
scholarships to be funded with net proceeds from the state lottery or the
Higher Education Grants Fund, failure of the sponsor of a bill to provide the
fiscal impact statement required in this rule shall not prohibit the
consideration of it in the committee to which referred or on the Floor of the
House of Representatives, if no objection to it is made at the time such
action is taken.
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
(2)(A) A bill filed in the House of Representatives that
will impose a new or increased cost obligation for health benefit plans,
including pharmacy benefits, on an entity of the state on the State and
Public School Life and Health Insurance Program shall:
(i) Have a fiscal impact statement attached to
the bill prepared and filed with the chair of the committee to which the bill
is referred; and
(ii) Not be taken up by the committee to which
the bill is referred until a fiscal impact statement is provided to the chair
of the committee.
(B) If a bill is called up for final passage in the
House of Representatives and a fiscal impact statement has not been provided
by the sponsor of the bill or by the committee to which the bill was
referred, a member of the House of Representatives may object to the bill’s
being called up for final passage until a fiscal impact statement is prepared
and made available on the desk of each member of the House of Representatives
at least one (1) day before the bill is called up for final passage.
(C) An affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of a
quorum present and voting shall override the objection.
(D) If an objection is made without override, the
presiding officer of the House of Representatives shall cause the bill to be
referred to an actuary for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement,
which shall be filed with the presiding officer not later than five (5) days
from the date of the request.
(3)(A) Any bill filed with the House of Representatives
that creates a new scholarship to be funded with net proceeds from the state
lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account, as applicable, or
affects an existing scholarship that is funded with net proceeds from the
state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account, as applicable,
shall:
(i) Have a lottery fiscal impact statement
attached to it that is in the form set forth in Arkansas Code § 6-85-502; and
(ii) Not be taken up by the House Committee on
Education and the Senate Committee on Education meeting jointly, until a
lottery fiscal impact statement is attached.
39.(a) The first reading of a bill shall be for information and unless
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
otherwise ordered by the House, it shall be placed on the second reading
calendar. (Every bill shall be read at length on three different days in
each house, unless the rules be suspended by two-thirds (2/3) of the House,
when the same may be read a second or third time on the same day; (Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 22 - Passage of bills.)
39.(b) No bill shall be read and considered either a first, second or
third time which does not contain a bill number, at least one author, a title
expressing the main contents of the bill, a subtitle, an enacting clause and
at least one section which shall be expressed in the title and the subtitle.
The Speaker shall not entertain a motion to suspend this rule.
39.(c)(1) "Shell bill" means a bill, typically with no substantive
provisions, that is introduced for purposes of later being amended to include
the actual legislative proposals advanced by the sponsor and within the
subject matter of the title of the shell bill.
(2) After a bill has been read for the first time, the
Speaker may declare a bill to be a shell bill and refer the shell bill to the
House Committee on the Journal; Engrossed and Enrolled Bills.
(3) Notwithstanding House Rule 40.(d), shell bills may be
amended after first reading with a substantive amendment under the process of
members amending their own bills with their own amendments. If the Committee
on the Journal; Engrossed and Enrolled Bills determines that the shell bill
has been substantively amended and engrossed and no longer meets the
definition of a shell bill, it shall report its determination to the Speaker.
The Speaker shall then direct the Clerk to read the bill a second time and
assign the bill to committee.
40. Second reading
40.(a) A bill shall be read a second time and the Speaker shall assign
the bill to its appropriate committee.
40.(b) A bill or resolution may not be divided for assignment to
committee although it may contain certain matters properly within the
jurisdiction of several committees.
40.(c) Before consideration by a committee, any representative may
attach an amendment to the bill which shall be referred to the committee with
the bill, without debate. It is the author’s responsibility to have the
amendment properly numbered by the Bill Clerk, not the committee staff. An
amendment must be properly filed by the author and properly numbered by the
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
Bill Clerk prior to being voted on by the House.
40.(d) In order to amend a bill, it shall be necessary to adopt a
motion to place the bill back on second reading for the purpose of submitting
an amendment.
40.(e) When a bill has a committee recommendation, it is the author’s
responsibility to place the bill on the calendar for consideration.
41.(a) A bill shall not be called for a third reading and final
passage until a photocopied, printed copy, or electronic copy of same shall
have been placed on every representative’s desk for twenty-four (24) hours.
The twenty-four (24) hour period begins when a bill is initially
introduced and read across the desk.
41.(b) A bill shall not be placed on a committee agenda until the
second calendar day following the initial filing of the bill.
42. A calendar of bills and resolutions to be considered in the order
of business during any legislative day shall be printed and placed on the
members’ desks prior to the adjournment of the preceding legislative day.
Calendared items are considered to be a motion for passage.
43. A bill ordered to be engrossed or enrolled shall be typed or
photocopied.
44. A bill having been rejected may not be brought up again during the
same legislative session unless it be an appropriation bill. Appropriation
bills may be considered a total of two times during any calendar day.
Following a second consideration during the same calendar day, a motion to
reconsider or a motion to expunge must be adopted before an appropriation
bill may be considered.
45.(a) When a bill has been passed and transmitted to the Senate, it
may be recalled from the Senate by the same vote that was necessary to pass
the bill.
45.(b) When a bill has been passed and transmitted to the Governor's
Office, it may be recalled from the Governor's Office by the same vote that
was necessary to pass the bill.
46. A committee may receive a bill, resolution, amendment, petition
and memorial only through the House, and the House may receive same only
through a member. (Art.5, Sec. 34 -- No new bill shall be introduced into
either house during the last three days of a regular or fiscal session.)
47. Amendments to bills and resolutions:
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
47.(a) When a bill or resolution is under consideration, amendments
shall be in order. Upon adoption, amendments shall become a part of the bill
or resolution. Amendments to amendments may not be offered. All amendments
offered before the House or one of its committees must be typewritten on an
approved amendment form and signed by the sponsor. All amendments shall be
attached to the original bill, numbered by the Bill Clerk, and shall be
placed physically or electronically upon the members’ desks before being
acted upon by the House.
47.(b) When a House bill has been amended in the Senate, upon return
of said bill to the House, the Speaker shall re-refer the bill, together with
the Senate amendment(s), to the committee to which the bill was originally
referred, for review. Concurrence in the Senate amendment shall not be
considered by the House until the committee report is received by the House.
When a House bill is amended and passed by the Senate and is returned to the
House, the bill shall be reprinted with the Senate amendments included
therein and specifically identified and shall be placed on each member’s desk
before final action is taken on the bill by the House. When the Senate
amendment is before the House, the same number of votes will be required to
concur in the Senate amendment as was required in the original passage of the
bill in the House. Amendments containing an emergency clause require sixty-
seven (67) votes.
47.(c) Fifty-one (51) votes shall be required to adopt a House
amendment to a House or Senate bill. When a House bill has been amended in
the House, it shall not be acted upon until it has been engrossed and such
engrossed bill has been printed and placed on each member’s desk.
47.(d) Every amendment proposed must be germane to the subject of the
proposition to be amended.
47.(e) All appropriation bills and other bills which are required to
be submitted to the Budget Committee, or to another designated committee of
the House and Senate, which are amended on the Floor of either House of the
General Assembly by an amendment which was not recommended favorably by the
Budget Committee, or by any other committee of the House and Senate to which
referred, shall be re-referred to such committee of the House and Senate for
consideration and recommendation before said bill may be considered for final
passage or concurrence by the House of Representatives.
47.(f) Members’ own House bills and Senate bills on which a House
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
member is the lead sponsor may be amended with their own amendments beginning
at a specific time set aside by the House. Senate bills may be amended in
accordance with the applicable rules provided for amending members' own House
bills with their own amendments.
47.(g) Members’ own amendments to their own House bills and Senate
bills with House sponsors must be signed only by the sponsor of the bill
whose name is listed first in the list of sponsors.
47.(h) Members’ own amendments to their own House bills and Senate
bills on which there are House sponsors must be presented to the House Bill
Clerk only by the sponsor of the House or Senate bill whose name is listed
first in the list of sponsors.
47.(i) After acceptance, the House Bill Clerk shall furnish the
sponsor with a stamped and numbered copy of the members’ signed amendment.
47.(j) The sponsor shall present a stamped, numbered and signed copy
of a proposed amendment to the Calendar Clerk in order to have the bill and
amendment placed on the “Members’ Own Bill/Own Amendment Calendar”.
47.(k) A House or Senate bill to be amended by a member with his or
her own amendment shall only be placed on the “Members’ Own Bill/Own
Amendment Calendar” by the sponsor whose name is listed first on the bill.
47.(l) An objection by any member, written or oral, to the Speaker of
the House or his or her designee, shall cause a member’s own amendment to his
or her own bill to not be considered and to be removed from the “Members’ Own
Bill/Own Amendment Calendar” and automatically placed on the same day’s
regular amendment calendar for consideration.
47.(m) A member’s own House bill or Senate bill amended with a
member’s own amendment shall be transmitted directly to Engrossing after
having been amended.
47.(n) No House or Senate bills having been amended shall be
considered by any committee or the full House until such bills have been
engrossed, proofed and reported “correctly engrossed”. The Speaker or
presiding officer shall not accept a motion to suspend this rule.
47.(o) Members’ own House bills or Senate bills to be amended with
their own amendments shall be placed on the “Members’ Own Bill/Own Amendment
Calendar” the day preceding the day they are to be considered.
47.(p) When a bill has a committee recommendation and is subsequently
amended to change the title, and/or the list of sponsors and/or an emergency
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
clause, such amendment shall not cause the bill to be re-referred to
committee.
47.(q) Members’ own House bills may be withdrawn at a specific time
set aside by the House by placing them on the “Withdrawal Calendar”, the day
preceding the day they are to be withdrawn. House bills for withdrawal may be
placed on the “Withdrawal Calendar” only by the member whose name is listed
first as author of the bill. The member requesting withdrawal may recommend
the bill to be studied by the same committee to which the bill was assigned
at the time of request for withdrawal.
47.(r) The Speaker of the House at a specific time set aside by the
House may transfer to another committee bills or resolutions by placing them
on the “Re-referral Calendar” no later than 4:30 p.m. the day before they are
to be transferred.
47.(s) Budget bills sponsored by members but recommended to be amended to
delete the sponsor and substitute the Joint Budget Committee as sponsor may
be amended during the period set aside to amend "Members Own Bills with their
Own Amendments".
47.(t) The Rules governing members amending their own bills with their
own amendments shall be in effect for House and Senate Budget bills so far as
they are applicable.
47.(u) Budget bills to be amended deleting the sponsor and
substituting the Joint Budget Committee shall be placed on the Joint Budget
Calendar by the Joint Budget Calendar Clerk.
47.(v) The House Chairman of the Joint Budget Committee shall sign all
amendments deleting the sponsor and substituting the Joint Budget Committee
as sponsor.

RESOLUTIONS
48. Resolutions shall follow the same procedure as bills.
49. A House resolution shall be directed at some matter for the sole
action of the House and may be introduced in extraordinary sessions, lack of
germaneness notwithstanding. Fifty-one (51) votes shall be required to adopt
a House resolution.
50. Joint resolutions are for incidental, unusual, or informal
objectives of legislation (i.e., as extending the thanks of the State to
individuals; invitations to celebrities to visit the State), or to submit
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
proposed amendments to the United States Constitution, ratifying United
States Constitutional amendments and proposing amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution.
51. Concurrent resolutions shall be a means of expressing fact,
principles, opinions, purposes, and all other matters requiring concurrence
of both houses except the subject matter provided for in the joint
resolution. A concurrent resolution is binding on neither house until agreed
to by both.
52. Resolutions of Inquiry:
52.(a) All resolutions of inquiry addressed to the heads of executive
departments shall be reported to the House within one (1) week after
presentation.
52.(b) A House resolution authorizing a committee to request
information is treated as a resolution of inquiry.
52.(c) A resolution of inquiry from a committee shall have a
privileged status to report.

STANDING, SELECT, AND SPECIAL COMMITTEES
(Arkansas Code, Title 10, Subchapter 2 -- Interim Committees Generally)
53. The committees of the House of Representatives shall consist of
ten (10) standing committees, seven (7) select committees, and three (3)
special committees. The standing committees shall be five (5) Class "A"
committees and five (5) Class "B" committees. The seven (7) select
committees shall be five (5) joint select committees and two (2) House select
committees. The three (3) special committees shall be two (2) joint
committees and one (1) House committee. The House standing, joint select,
select and special committees are as follows:
53.(a) HOUSE STANDING COMMITTEES
Class "A" Committees
Education
Judiciary
Public Health, Welfare and Labor
Public Transportation
Revenue and Taxation
Class "B" Committees
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
Agriculture, Forestry and Economic Development
City, County and Local Affairs
Insurance and Commerce
State Agencies and Governmental Affairs
53.(b) JOINT SELECT COMMITTEES
(1) Joint Budget -- (to consist of twenty four (24) members of the
House and twenty four (24) members of the Senate, and the immediate past co-
chairs of the Legislative Council and ex-officio members in accordance with
Arkansas Code § 10-3-502. (Arkansas Code, Subchapter 5, -- Joint Budget
Committee) The House members of the Joint Budget Committee shall be known as
the House Budget Committee.
(2) Joint Committee on Energy -- (to consist of fifteen (15) members
of the House, fifteen (15) House alternates, and ten (10) members of the
Senate. (Arkansas Code, Title 10, Subchapter 8 -- Energy Committees.)
(3) Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security
Programs -- (to consist of ten (10) members of the House, ten (10) House
alternates, and ten (10) members of the Senate. (Arkansas Code, Title 10,
Subchapter 7 -- Retirement Committees)
(4) Joint Performance Review Committee -- (to consist of twenty (20)
members of the House and ten (10) members of the Senate. (Arkansas Code,
Title 10, Subchapter 9 -- Joint Performance Review Committees)
(5) Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information
Technology -- (to consist of ten (10) members of the House, ten (10) House
alternates, and seven (7) members of the Senate. (Arkansas Code, Title 10,
Subchapter 17 -- Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information
Technology)
53.(c) HOUSE SELECT COMMITTEES
House Rules Committee shall consist of no more than fifteen (15)
members.
House Management Committee shall consist of the Speaker and no more
than six (6) additional members.
53.(d) SPECIAL COMMITTEES
(1) Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities -- (to
consist of fourteen (14) members of the General Assembly, as follows:
(a) The chairperson of the House Budget Committee;
(b) Two (2) members of the House of Representatives
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
appointed by the Speaker;
(c) The chairperson of the House Management Committee and
two (2) additional members of the House Management Committee to be designated
by its chairperson;
(d) The Speaker of the House of Representatives or his or
her designee; and
(e) Seven (7) members of the Senate to be named by the
Senate Committee on Committees. (Arkansas Code, Title 10, Subchapter 11 --
Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities)
(2) House Committee on the Journal; Engrossed and Enrolled Bills
shall consist of not more than five (5) members. The House Committee on the
Journal; Engrossed and Enrolled Bills shall not be considered a standing or
select committee. The committee shall consist of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives or his or her designee who shall be chairperson, the
chairperson of the House Rules Committee who shall be the vice chairperson,
the chairperson of the House Management Committee, and two (2) members of the
House appointed by the Speaker of the House; and, the House Parliamentarian
shall serve as secretary and advisor to the committee. The chairperson of the
committee shall receive an allowance in accordance with Arkansas Code § 10-2-
215.
(3) Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and
Specifications -- (to consist of the chairperson and vice chairperson of the
House Management Committee, the chairperson and vice chairperson of the
Senate Efficiency Committee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives or
his or her designee and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. (Arkansas
Code, Title 10, Subchapter 6 -- Joint Committee on Legislative Printing
Requirements and Specifications)
54.(a) STANDING COMMITTEES
(1) Selection of membership positions on House committees for
members-elect shall take place during the caucus of the entire House of
Representatives-elect following the November General Election.
(2) Each standing committee shall consist of twenty (20)
members. Each member of the House of Representatives shall serve on two (2)
standing committees, one (1) of which shall be a Class “A” standing committee
and one (1) of which shall be a Class “B” standing committee. A member may
not serve on more than one (1) committee of the same class. Members of the
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
standing committees shall be selected as follows:
(A) Each Class “A” standing committee and each Class “B”
standing committee shall have five (5) members from each of the four (4)
House district caucuses.
(B)(i) The most senior member of the House of
Representatives shall select first and shall choose a position on a Class “A”
standing committee. The next-senior member shall then choose a position on a
Class “A” standing committee. The seniority rotation procedure shall
continue until the member with the least seniority makes his or her
selection.
(ii) After the member with the least seniority makes
his or her Class “A” standing committee selection, the most senior member
shall select his or her Class “B” standing committee. The seniority rotation
shall continue until the member with the least seniority selects his or her
Class “B” standing committee.
(C)(i) A member may trade a committee membership with
another member.
(ii) A trade of committee membership may only occur
by the close of business on the day of the committee selection process.
(iii) A trade of committee membership shall be in
writing and signed by the members who are trading their committee
memberships, the trading members’ political caucus leaders, and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives.
(iv) Once completed, written and signed
documentation of the trade of committee membership shall filed in the House
Journal.
(D)(i) The Speaker of the House shall have the authority
to make adjustments to committee membership following the committee selection
process only for the purpose of adjusting the majority to minority party
ratio on the standing committees.
(ii) The adjustments to committee membership made by
the Speaker shall not exceed placing eleven (11) members of the majority
party on a twenty (20) member committee.
(3) Standing committee membership shall be confirmed at the same
time that House members are administered the oath of office.
(4) From within each standing committee there shall be created
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
three (3) permanent subcommittees consisting of eight (8) members. Each
member of the House of Representatives shall serve on two (2) permanent
subcommittees, one (1) from a Class “A” standing committee and one (1) from a
Class “B” standing committee. The Speaker of the House of Representatives and
the chairperson of each standing committee shall jointly appoint from the
membership of the standing committee six (6) persons for each permanent
subcommittee available, provided further the chairperson and vice chairperson
of each standing committee shall be ex-officio, voting members of each
permanent subcommittee created from within their standing committee. The
permanent subcommittees of the standing committees may meet after having
first obtained prior approval of the standing committee chairperson.
(5) There shall be no transfers from one standing committee to
another or from one permanent subcommittee to another during the biennium
following initial biennial appointment and or confirmation. After selection
of standing committee members and permanent subcommittee members, a vacancy
occurring on a standing committee or permanent subcommittee during the
biennium because of the death, resignation, expulsion, etc., of a member,
shall be temporarily filled by the Speaker of the House of Representatives
assigning the newly elected member, for the remainder of the biennium, to the
“A” and “B” standing committees, and the permanent subcommittees previously
held by their predecessor. The newly elected member does not automatically
assume a chairmanship or vice-chairmanship, which vacancies shall be filled
in the same manner as the original appointment.
(6) A non-returning member of the House of Representatives who
has been assigned an office or other premises shall vacate the office or
other premises by December 15 following the General Election in the even-
numbered years; and, by the same date, a returning member shall be prepared
to vacate his or her assigned office or premises at the direction of the
Speaker.
54.(b) SELECT COMMITTEES
(1) With the exception of the House Budget Committee, the
Speaker shall appoint all members and all alternates on all House select
committees and all Joint Select Committees. The Speaker shall appoint ex-
officio members in accordance with the law.
(2)(A) Selection of positions on the House Budget Committee
shall occur following the Class “A” standing committee and Class “B” standing
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
committee selections and in conjunction with selection of members for the
Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
(B) The most senior member of the House of Representatives
shall select first and shall choose a primary or alternate position on the
House Budget Committee, the Legislative Council, or the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee. The next-senior member shall then choose a primary or
alternate position on the House Budget Committee, the Legislative Council, or
the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee. The seniority rotation procedure
shall continue until the member with the least seniority makes his or her
selection or until all primary and alternate positions on the House Budget
Committee, the Legislative Council, or the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee are filled.
(C)(i) The Speaker of the House shall have the authority
to make adjustments to committee membership following the committee selection
process only for the purpose of adjusting the majority to minority ratio on
the House Budget Committee, the Legislative Council, and the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee.
(ii) The adjustments to committee membership made by
the Speaker shall not exceed the minimum necessary to ensure majority party
membership exceeds minority party membership on the committees.
(iii) Final committee memberships shall be announced
no later than the House Orientation held in December before a Regular
Session.
(3) The House Budget Committee shall consist of six (6) members
of the House of Representatives and two (2) alternates from each House caucus
district. At the time the alternates are selected, one (1) shall be
designated as first alternate and the other as second alternate. The term of
office of the members shall be from January 1 of odd-numbered years through
December 31 of the following even-numbered year. Vacancies in either a member
or alternate member position shall be filled in the same manner as the
initial member or alternate member position was filled. House Budget
Committee membership shall be confirmed at the same time that House members
are administered the oath of office. Prior to confirmation, however, members
chosen to serve on the House Budget Committee shall conduct pre-session
budget hearings, either standing alone or in conjunction with the Legislative
Council.
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
(4) No member of the House of Representatives shall serve on
more than one (1) select committee. The Legislative Council, the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee, the House Budget Committee, the House Committee on
the Journal; Engrossed and Enrolled Bills, and the House Management Committee
are excluded therefrom.
54.(c)(1) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint a
chairperson and a vice chairperson of each standing committee and each select
committee who shall serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives. The Speaker, in consultation with the chairperson of each
standing committee, shall appoint from the membership of each permanent
subcommittee, a chairperson and vice chairperson provided however that the
vice chairperson of the standing committee may be the chairperson of a
permanent subcommittee. No member of the House of Representatives, with the
exception of each House standing committee vice chairperson, shall be
chairperson or vice chairperson of more than one (1) standing committee,
select committee, or permanent subcommittee.
(2) The rules or proceedings of the House of Representatives
shall be observed in all select committees, standing committees, and
subcommittees of the House of Representatives so far as the rules or
proceedings may be applicable.
(3) The House Committee on the Journal; Engrossed and Enrolled
Bills shall serve as the supervisory committee over the preparation of the
Journal and engrossing and enrolling of bills.
(4) After the membership of a standing committee or a permanent
subcommittee is established, no member shall be removed from any standing
committee or any permanent subcommittee during the biennium for which he or
she was selected. All appointees selected by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives serve at his or her discretion.
55. Committee Operations.
55.(a) Each committee of the House shall be provided a secretary who
shall maintain a current record of all bills, resolutions, amendments,
petitions, memorials, or other matters filed in committee. A record of
committee actions (committee reports, committee adopted amendments, etc.)
shall be filed with the Chief Clerk of the House as the first priority upon
adjournment of the committee. The secretary shall post, on a bulletin board
and/or electronically, a current list of all measures pending before the
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
committee.
55.(b) All committees shall consider the bills, resolutions,
amendments, petitions, and memorials referred to them and make one of the
following reports in writing to the House:
(1) That a bill, resolution, petition or memorial “do pass”;
(2) That a bill, resolution, petition or memorial “do not pass”,
in which event the measure shall not be considered unless the vote is
expunged;
(3) That a bill, resolution, petition or memorial “do pass as
amended”.
55.(c) No bill, resolution, petition or memorial shall be acted upon
by the House without a “do pass” or a “do pass as amended” recommendation.
No bills shall be placed on the non-controversial calendar or deemed to be
non-controversial in any way unless a motion is adopted in the committee to
which the bill was referred. With a quorum present, the motion is considered
adopted if there are no negative votes.
55.(d) The appropriate subject matter standing committees of the House
and the Senate may meet as joint committees whenever agreed by said
committees, for the purposes of holding public hearings or considering any
proposed or pending legislation but upon conclusion of the joint meeting of
said committees, each standing committee of the House of Representatives and
the Senate shall take such action and report to their respective houses as
determined by said committees. Whenever the appropriate subject committees
of the House and Senate hold hearings or meetings, the chairperson of the
House committee and the chairperson of the Senate committee shall by
agreement determine which of them shall preside at the joint meeting.
Rules 56-59 [Repealed.]
60. Meetings and Hearings:
60.(a) All committee and subcommittee meetings including but not
limited to hearings at which public testimony is to be taken, (normally
called “public hearings”) shall be open to the public (Arkansas Constitution,
Article 5, § 13, Sessions to be open.) and shall be scheduled at least
eighteen (18) hours in advance; agendas of bills, resolutions, and other
proposals to be considered at such meetings shall be posted in a designated
place at least eighteen (18) hours in advance; but in case of an emergency, a
two-thirds (2/3) majority of the membership of the committee may bring bills
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
up for consideration upon notice of not less than two (2) hours.
60.(b) Special meetings of a standing committee may be called by the
chairperson of the committee or by a majority of the members of the committee
for conducting any business of the committee; provided, a special meeting of
the committee may not conflict with regularly scheduled meetings of any
standing committee; provided further, special meetings shall be subject to
the same procedures regarding the publishing of agendas and notices of
meetings that apply to regular standing committee meetings.
60.(c) The Speaker of the House shall establish a schedule of House
standing and select committee meetings so as to minimize conflicts.
61.(a) All persons wishing to offer testimony to a committee hearing
shall be given a reasonable opportunity to do so as determined by a majority
of the committee. An oral or written statement shall not be a prerequisite
to offer testimony before a committee.
61.(b)(1) The committee shall have the opportunity to ask questions of
persons offering testimony.
(2) Electronic devices such as smart phones, tablets or personal
computers may be used by participants in debate but during presentations may
not be employed for personal communications with outside parties.
62. All contested elections cases entertained by the House shall be
referred to the Rules Committee which shall make its final recommendation not
later than two (2) weeks from the first day of the session.
63. No committee shall sit while the House is in session except the
Committee on Rules or a Conference Committee, which shall notify the House.
64.(a) The following subject areas shall be within the jurisdiction of
each of the respective House standing committees:
(1) Committee on Education – matters pertaining to public
kindergarten, elementary, secondary, and adult education, vocational
education, vocational-technical schools, vocational rehabilitation, higher
education, private educational institutions, similar legislation, and
resolutions germane to the subject matter of the committee;
(2) Committee on Judiciary – matters pertaining to state and
local courts, court clerks and stenographers and other employees of the
courts, civil and criminal procedures, probate matters, civil and criminal
laws, similar matters, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the
committee;
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
(3) Committee on Public Health, Welfare and Labor – matters
pertaining to public health, mental health, mental retardation illness,
intellectual disability, public welfare, human relations and resources,
environmental affairs, water and air pollution, labor and labor relations,
contractors and contracting, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to
the subject matter of the committee;
(4) Committee on Public Transportation – matters pertaining to
roads and highways, city streets, county roads, road vehicles, highway
safety, airports and air transportation, common and contract carriers, mass
transit, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter
of the committee;
(5) Committee on Revenue and Taxation – matters pertaining to
the levy, increase, reduction, collection, enforcement and administration of
taxes and other revenue-producing measures, and resolutions germane to the
subject matter of the committee;
(6) Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs – matters pertaining to the aged, child custody, adoptions,
problems of aging; children and youth, military, veterans, legislative
affairs, memorials, other matters whenever the subject matter is not germane
to the subject matter of any other standing committee and resolutions germane
to the subject matter of the committee;
(7) Committee on Agriculture, Forestry and Economic Development
– matters pertaining to agriculture, livestock, forestry, industrial
development, natural resources, oil and gas, publicity and parks, levee and
drainage, rivers and harbors, similar legislation and resolutions germane to
the subject matter of the committee;
(8) Committee on City, County and Local Affairs – matters
pertaining to city and municipal affairs, county affairs, local improvement
districts, water districts, interlocal government cooperation, similar
legislation and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the committee;
(9) Committee on Insurance and Commerce – matters pertaining to
banks and banking, savings and loan associations, stock, bonds, and other
securities, securities dealers, insurance, public utilities, partnerships and
corporations, home mortgage financing and housing, similar legislation and
resolutions germane to the subject matter of the committee;
(10) Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs –
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
matters pertaining to state government and state agencies, except where the
subject matter relates more appropriately to another committee, proposed
amendments to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas or the Federal
government, election laws and procedures, Federal and interstate relations,
similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the
committee;
64.(b) The following permanent subcommittees are hereby created from
within each standing committee:
(1)For the House standing committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs, the following permanent subcommittees are
created:
(A) Aging
(B) Children and Youth
(C) Legislative, Military and Veterans Affairs
(2) For the House standing committee on Agriculture, Forestry
and Economic Development, the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Agriculture, Forestry and Natural Resources
(B) Small Business and Economic Development
(C) Parks and Tourism
(3) For House standing committee on City, County and Local
Affairs, the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Planning
(B) Finance
(C) Local Government Personnel
(4) For the House standing committee on Education, the following
permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Early Childhood
(B) Kindergarten Through Twelve, Vocational/Technical
Institutions
(C) Higher Education
(5) For the House standing committee on Insurance and Commerce,
the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Financial Institutions
(B) Insurance
(C) Utilities
(6) For the House standing committee on Judiciary, the following
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Courts/Civil Law
(B) Corrections/Criminal Law
(C) Juvenile Justice/Child Support
(7) For the House standing committee on Public Health, Welfare
and Labor, the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Human Services
(B) Health Services
(C) Labor and Environment
(8) For the House standing committee on Public Transportation,
the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Motor Vehicle and Highways
(B) Public Transportation and Rail
(C) Waterways and Aeronautics
(9) For the House standing committee on Revenue and Taxation,
the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) Sales, Use, Miscellaneous Taxes and Exemptions
(B) Income Taxes—Personal and Corporate
(C) Complaints and Remediation
(10) For the House standing committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs, the following permanent subcommittees are created:
(A) State Agencies and Reorganization
(B) Constitutional Issues
(C) Elections
65.(a) Committee on Rules:
(1) All proposed action touching the rules, joint rules, and
order of business shall be referred to the Committee on Rules.
(2) It shall always be in order to call up, for consideration, a
report from the Committee on Rules.
(3) The Committee on Rules shall present to the House reports
concerning rules, joint rules, and order of business on the third day after
convening of the House. The permanent rules shall be adopted by a majority
of the members and thereafter they may be changed only by a vote of sixty-
seven (67) members.
(4) The Speaker shall refer any matter he or she deems
appropriate to the Committee on Rules, including without limitation any
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
matters dealing with alcohol, cigarettes, movies, pornography, tobacco,
tobacco products, coin operated amusement devices, vending machines,
lobbying, code of ethics, bingo, lotteries, raffles, racing, race tracks,
pari-mutuel betting and similar legislation.
(5) Rules of the preceding General Assembly shall automatically
be adopted as temporary rules of the current assembly and may be amended or
suspended by a majority vote of the membership.
65.(b) House Budget Committee. All appropriation bills coming before
the House shall be assigned to and considered by the House Budget Committee.
66. No committee shall transact business without a quorum (a majority
of the committee membership present). The request for a quorum call is
always in order. All final action on bills, and on proposed amendments to
bills, shall be decided by a majority vote of the total membership of the
committee. Provided, however, that the Speaker of the House shall not be
included for the purpose of determining what is a majority of a standing
committee, unless present at the time of the vote. A member of the committee
must be present at the time of the vote for his or her vote to be counted on
any matter considered by the committee (no pairs, no proxies).
66.(a) A bill, resolution or amendment in a House committee, having
been rejected twice, shall not be placed on the committee calendar again or
considered again during the same legislative session unless the vote is
expunged (two-thirds of the membership of the committee). The motion to
expunge shall be placed by a committee member at the bottom of the committee
agenda. A bill or resolution may be amended before a second consideration;
but, unless expunged, even an amended bill having failed twice shall not be
placed on the calendar or considered.
67. Upon written request by the author of a bill directed to the
chairperson of the committee, a bill shall be considered by the full
committee within ten (10) days of the time of such request, but the
committees may delay final action on a bill by a majority vote of the
committee.
68. No bill shall be introduced with a committee as the author of said
bill unless that committee has voted unanimously to sponsor the bill.
69. Committee Records and Reports:
69.(a) The chairperson of each committee of the House shall keep or
cause to be kept a separate record for each committee meeting in which there
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
shall be entered:
(1) The time and place of each hearing and each meeting of the
committee.
(2) The number and title of the bill with one of the following
three recommendations: “do pass”, “do pass as amended”, or “do not pass”. If
a committee recommends a bill “do pass as amended” and any of the amendments
recommended by the committee are not adopted on the Floor, the bill shall be
re-referred to the same committee for further consideration and
recommendation.
(3) A summary of each bill’s major provision which may be
several paragraphs in length in case of major bills or simply the title of
the bill in the case of minor bills.
(4) The reason for the committee’s action on the bill, including
a brief minority report, if requested by any two (2) committee members.
(5) A record of how every member voted on each bill when action
is taken by the committee, including votes on a motion to postpone
consideration on the bill and a recorded vote on any other motion, if
requested by any two (2) committee members.
(6) A list of all people testifying before a committee on each
bill, the interest that they represent, and an indication of their position
on the bill.
69.(b) Such records for each separate committee meeting shall be
approved by the chairperson before the expiration of a seven (7) day period,
with the exception of those records referred to in (a) 1. and 2., hereinabove
which shall be filed immediately with the Clerk of the House.
69.(c) Other reports may be filed with the Clerk of the House.
70. Consent Calendar – Supplemental Calendar. In addition to the
regular calendar of the House of Representatives, there shall be a consent
calendar on which shall be placed bills that have been recommended “do pass”
by committee, which are deemed by the committee or by the Speaker to be non-
controversial, and may be used for other non-controversial matters such as
resolutions and amendments to bills proposed by the author of the bill, if
the Speaker deems such matter to be non-controversial. The Speaker of the
House shall maintain the consent calendar. Provided, that a list of bills
and other matters on the consent calendar which are to be considered on a
particular day shall be circulated among the members of the House of
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
Representatives the day prior to the date on which the consent calendar is to
be considered. If as many as five (5) members object to a bill or other
matter on the consent calendar being considered as non-controversial, the
Speaker of the House shall remove the same from the consent calendar and
shall place it on the regular calendar of the House business. When deemed
advisable, in addition to the regular calendar and the consent calendar, the
Speaker may provide for a supplemental calendar on which shall be placed
bills and resolutions and other matters as requested by the members for
consideration. The list of bills, resolutions and other matters on the
supplemental calendar for consideration on a particular day shall be
circulated among the members of the House. If as many as five (5) members
object to a bill, resolution or any other matter on the supplemental calendar
the same shall be removed and placed on the regular House calendar for
consideration consistent with the wishes of the House. No bill or resolution
may be placed for consideration on any more than one (1) House calendar,
supplemental calendars excepted.
71. A vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the elected membership of the House
of Representatives shall be necessary to remove a bill from a committee. A
bill may be reported by a committee at any time as provided by the House
Rules except for bills introduced after the fiftieth (50th) day of the
Regular Session, or during a special session, which shall, upon written
request by the author, be acted on at the next regular meeting of the
committee, but committees may delay final action on a bill by a majority vote
of the committee.
72.(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), no action may be taken in
the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare and Labor or on the Floor of
the House of Representatives on any bill that provides for licensure of any
profession, occupation or class of health care providers not currently
licensed or expands the scope of practice of any profession, occupation, or
class of health care providers unless the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare and Labor has initiated a study of the feasibility of such
legislation at least thirty (30) days prior to convening the next legislative
session.
72.(b) A bill providing for the licensure of any profession,
occupation, or class of health care providers not currently licensed or
expanding the scope of any practice of any profession, occupation, or class
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
of health care providers may be acted upon without the initiation of a
feasibility study required in subsection (a) upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of
the House Public Health, Welfare and Labor Committee membership.

COMMITTEE OF THE WHOLE
73. All measures involving a tax or an appropriation of money, or
property, may be first considered in a Committee of the Whole, amendments can
be offered in the Committee of the Whole.
74. The Speaker of the House, in setting the calendar of budgets or
appropriation bills to be considered in the House shall, from time to time,
confer with the chairperson of the House Budget Committee on the
appropriation bills pending and may designate specific days or times to be
set aside in the House to be devoted solely to consideration of appropriation
bills and other budget matters. At least by the end of business on the
previous day before any appropriation bill is to be considered by the House,
the chairperson of the House Budget Committee shall cause to be prepared and
placed on each member’s desk a listing of appropriation bills to be
considered in the Committee of the Whole or the House, broken down as
follows:
74.(a) Appropriation bills sponsored by the Joint Budget Committee or
the House Budget Committee, prepared in accordance with Legislative Council
recommendations;
74.(b) All other appropriation bills sponsored by the Joint Budget
Committee or the House Budget Committee which were not considered by the
Legislative Council;
74.(c) Bills introduced by members of the House (or Senate) that shall
have been recommended by the Joint Budget Committee or the House Budget
Committee “do pass” or “do pass as amended”; and
74.(d) Appropriation bills amended in the Senate without Joint Budget
Committee or House Budget Committee action. The aforementioned list of
appropriation bills shall include the number of the bill, the author of the
bill, and the name and agency and/or program for which the appropriation is
to be made. In the event the Joint Budget Committee or the House Budget
Committee recommendations in regard to the appropriation shall differ, in any
respect, from the recommendations made by the Legislative Council in regard
thereto, said list shall identify each such change in the appropriation bill
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
which differs from the recommendation of the Legislative Council.
75. In forming a Committee of the Whole House, the Speaker may leave
his or her chair after appointing a chairperson to preside, who shall have
the same power as the Speaker to preserve order. A majority of a quorum is
required to resolve the House into a Committee of the Whole.
76. When the House resolves itself into the Committee of the Whole,
non-members who are to participate in the matters to be discussed may be
invited into the House Chambers by the proponents or opponents of the
proposals to be discussed but all such non-members shall leave at the time
the committee arises.
77. A Committee of the Whole cannot report a measure without a quorum
of its members present.
78. The rules and proceedings of the House shall be observed in
Committee of the Whole House so far as they may be applicable. Decisions
will be made by voice or standing votes.
79. No motion which has as its effect the limiting of debate in the
Committee of the Whole shall be entertained by the chairperson. The motion
for the disposition of any matter referred to the committee shall be, “Mr. or
Madam Chair, I move the committee do now rise and report”. If the committee
had no specific report, the motion should be to rise and report progress.

LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL; LEGISLATIVE JOINT AUDITING COMMITTEE
80. Legislative Council.
80.(a)(1) The House of Representatives shall select twenty (20)
members to serve on the Legislative Council, to include five (5) members from
each of the four (4) House district caucuses, in the manner set forth in Rule
54.(b) of these rules.
(2) The Speaker shall select one (1) of their number as
Legislative Council co-chair and one (1) of their number as Legislative
Council co-vice-chair. No more than two (2) members selected from each caucus
shall reside within the same county. The term of office of the members shall
be from January 1 of odd-numbered years to December 31 of the following even-
numbered year. Legislative Council membership shall be confirmed at the same
time that House members are administered the oath of office.
80.(b) In order that there may be no House vacancies on the
Legislative Council at any time, at the time of selection of the House
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
members to the Legislative Council, there shall be selected from each House
Caucus District in the same manner as is set forth in Rule 54.(b) of these
rules, a first alternate and a second alternate for each member selected from
that district. In the event that any House member or House alternate of the
Legislative Council resigns from the Legislative Council, is disqualified
from serving on the Legislative Council, dies, or for any other reason there
becomes a permanent vacancy in a House position on the Legislative Council,
the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall select from the same House
caucus district a replacement member or alternate to serve the remainder of
the term. When a vacancy occurs in a House member position on the Legislative
Council or a House alternate position on the Legislative Council, that
person’s alternate shall serve until a new member is chosen. The Speaker of
the House of Representatives shall notify the Legislative Council chairperson
of all changes in membership on the Legislative Council.
80.(c) Ex-officio members shall be selected in accordance with
Arkansas Code § 10-3-301.
81. Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
81.(a) The House of Representatives shall select twenty (20) members to
serve on the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, to include five (5)
members from each of the four (4) House District Caucuses, in the manner set
forth in Rule 54.(b) of these rules. Following the selections, the Speaker
of the House of Representatives shall select one (1) of their number as
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee co-chair and one (1) of their number as
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee co-vice-chair. No more than two (2)
members shall reside within the same county. The term of office of the
members shall be from January 1 of odd-numbered years to December 31 of the
following even-numbered year. Legislative Joint Auditing Committee membership
shall be confirmed at the same time that House members are administered the
oath of office.
81.(b) In order that there may be no House vacancies on the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee at any time, at the time of selection of
the House members to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee there shall be
selected, from each House Caucus District in the same manner as is set forth
in Rule 54.(b) of these rules, a first alternate and a second alternate for
each member selected from that House caucus district. In the event that any
House member or House alternate of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
resigns from the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, is disqualified from
serving on the Committee, dies, or for any other reason there becomes a
permanent vacancy in a House position on the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall select from the
same House caucus district a replacement member or alternate to serve the
remainder of the term. When a vacancy occurs in a House member position on
the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or a House alternate position on the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, that person’s alternate shall serve
until a new member is chosen. The Speaker of the House of Representatives
shall notify the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee chairperson of all
changes in membership on the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
81.(c) Ex-officio members shall be selected in accordance with
Arkansas Code §§ 10-3-403 and 10-3-404.

CAUCUS DISTRICTS
82. Each of the four caucuses shall select from among the members of
the caucus a chairperson.
The First Caucus District shall be composed of the following House of
Representatives Districts: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35,
36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, and 68.
The Second Caucus District shall be composed of the following House of
Representatives Districts: 41, 42, 43, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 66, 67, 69,
70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 81, 82, and 83.
The Third Caucus District shall be composed of the following House of
Representatives Districts: 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19,
20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 47, 48, 49, 50, and 51.
The Fourth Caucus District shall be composed of the following House of
Representatives Districts: 29, 44, 45, 46, 52, 53, 65, 80, 84, 85, 86, 87,
88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, and 100.

DEBATE
83. When a representative desires to speak or to have the attention of
the House, he or she shall rise from his or her seat and respectfully address
himself or herself to “Mr. or Madam Speaker”, (or in the Committee of the
Whole, “Mr. or Madam Chairperson”) and upon recognition, he or she may
address the House from his or her seat or the “well” of the House.
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
Representatives must be at their seats before obtaining recognition. Any
representative who receives recognition from the Chair must confine himself
or herself to the question before the House, or a privileged motion. No
representative shall proceed until recognized by the Speaker. When two (2)
or more representatives arise at once, the Speaker shall name the member who
shall be first to speak.
84. When a representative desires to interrupt a representative having
the Floor, he or she shall first obtain recognition of the Speaker and
permission of the representative occupying the Floor; and when so recognized
and such permission is obtained, he or she may ask questions of the
representative occupying the Floor; but shall not propound a series of
interrogatives or otherwise badger the representative having the Floor.
85. No representative shall occupy more than thirty (30) minutes in
debate on any question in the House. The representative reporting a measure
under consideration from a committee or the author may open and close debate.
If debate shall extend beyond one (1) day, the author or sponsor shall be
entitled to thirty (30) minutes to close. The right to close may not be
automatically exercised after limited debate, the previous question or
immediate consideration is voted.
86. No representative shall speak more than once on the same question
without leave of the House. One (1) mover, proposer or introducer of the
question pending may speak the second time and close, but not until every
representative choosing to speak shall have been heard.
87. A representative having the Floor may not yield it to another for
any purpose including making a motion; but, if he or she desires to allow a
motion to be made, he or she must yield the Floor.

DECORUM
88. No person other than a member of the Arkansas General Assembly,
designated legislative staff, or on special and certain occasions those
persons specifically invited by the Speaker of the House, shall be permitted
on the Floor of the House Chamber while the House is in session or in brief
recess. The Speaker shall develop policies governing limited public access
to the Floor during the interim. Arrangements for photographers shall be
established, the direction and control of which shall be regulated by the
Speaker of the House. No one in the House Chamber other than a member of the
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
Legislature may advocate or oppose passage of a measure while the House is in
session. No legislative aides, lobbyists or unauthorized persons shall be
permitted access to the House Floor, work areas, or House support areas.
This Rule shall be enforced by the Speaker of the House and/or the House
Management Committee. The House Management Committee and the Rules Committee
shall recommend punishment to the House for violation of this Rule. (Arkansas
Code 10-2-110 -- Disorderly Conduct)
89. The House Chamber during regular, fiscal and special sessions and
during the interim shall be used only for the legislative business of the
House and for the caucus meetings of its members, except upon occasions where
the House, by resolution, agrees to take part in any ceremonies to be
observed therein; and the Speaker shall not entertain a motion for suspension
of this rule.
90. No representative shall use intemperate language with reference to
the House or its members.
91. If any representative, in speaking or otherwise, transgresses the
rules of the House, the Speaker shall or any representative may, call him or
her to order. He or she shall immediately be seated unless permitted, on a
motion of another representative, to explain. The House shall, if called
upon, decide on the issue without debate. If the decision is in favor of the
representative called to order, he or she shall be free to continue; and, if
the dispute shall warrant, a representative shall be open to censure or such
punishment as the House shall impose.
92. Normal conformity to good manners and taste shall be expected of
each member of the House. Representatives shall avoid references to
personalities and extend to each representative courtesies which they wish
for themselves.
93. Introduction of and recognition of family, constituents, or groups
shall not become excessive. Members should be extremely reluctant in using
the time of the House for these personal courtesies. If deemed appropriate by
the Speaker of the House, he or she shall make all introductions from
information provided to the Speaker by a member or appropriate House staff.
94. The smoking of cigarettes, cigars and pipes or other tobacco
products shall not be permitted in the Chamber of the House of
Representatives or in the members’ private work area.
95. A Roll Call shall not be interrupted by a motion or other order of
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
business from the time the Speaker calls up the ballot until he or she casts
up the ballot and announces the result of said ballot.

VOTING
96. No person not a representative shall cast a vote for a
representative.
97. Any question or motion, except final passage of a bill or final
action on a joint resolution, may be put to the House by a voice vote at the
discretion of the Speaker.
98. Any five (5) representatives shall have the right to call for the
ayes and nays and have the result entered on the Journal. (Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 12 -- Powers and duties of each house.)
99. Any representative who will be absent from the House may pair his
or her vote with a representative who shall be present.
99.(a) These representatives must be casting opposite votes.
99.(b) Dated pairs reflecting the bill number are counted when signed
by both representatives,
(1) in the presence of each other, and witnessed by another
representative, or
(2) when the member who will not be present for the vote signs
the pair form in the presence of a person authorized by law to take
acknowledgements and who verifies the identity of the signer.
99.(c) Pairs shall be presented to the Speaker only on the day of the
vote for which the representatives are paired is to be taken.
99.(d) Pairs shall be announced by the Speaker immediately prior to
the Roll Call from a Pair Form presented to the Speaker by the representative
present. At the time of the announcement the Speaker shall (1) determine
that the member who is required to be present is present, and (2) provide the
membership with an opportunity to express procedural objections to the pairs.
99.(e) The representative may not cast his or her vote by other
methods when he or she is paired.
100. The demand to “Sound the Ballot” (a device to determine how each
representative voted) may be accomplished by any five (5) members rising and
requesting the Speaker to have the names called and the way the member voted
repeated. When contested, any representative (except a representative voting
by pair vote and the Speaker and a substitute Speaker) who is not present and
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
in his seat shall have his or her vote eliminated.
101. After a voice vote, the Speaker or any five (5) representatives
that doubt the result may call for a division of the House.
101.(a) Representatives voting aye shall stand at their seats until
counted.
101.(b) Then, representatives voting no shall stand at their seats
until counted.
101.(c) No representative shall be counted that is not at his or her
assigned voting station (his or her seat on the House Floor).
101.(d) The Speaker or his or her designee shall be responsible for
counting the vote and the Speaker shall announce the result of the vote.
102. The Electronic Voting System shall have the same force and effect
as a Roll Call. (Not less than a majority of the members of each House of
the General Assembly may enact a law.) (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5,
§ 21, as added by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 19, § 1.)
103. The Speaker, with three (3) representatives, is sufficient to
adjourn, or recess to a time certain, or sine die. (Neither house shall,
without the consent of the other, adjourn for more than three (3) days, nor
to any other place than that in which the two (2) houses shall be sitting.)
(Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 28 -- Adjournments)
(Governor’s power to adjourn) In cases of disagreement between the
two (2) houses of the General Assembly, at a regular or special session, with
respect to the time of adjournment, the Governor may, if the facts be
certified to him or her by the presiding officers of the two (2) houses,
adjourn them to a time not beyond the day of their next meeting; and, on
account of danger from an enemy or disease, to such other place of safety as
he or she may think proper. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 20 -- Power
to adjourn General Assembly.)
104. Vetoes. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 16 6, §§ 15-17; Arkansas
Code § 10-2-116)
105. Extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly. (Arkansas
Constitution, Article 6, § 19 -- Extraordinary sessions of General Assembly -
- Calling -- Purposes.)
106. Homestead exemption increase (3/4 vote) (Arkansas Constitution,
Article 16, § 16, as added by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 59.)
107. Workmen’s Compensation Laws (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5,
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
§ 32, as amended by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 26.)
108. It shall be a violation of the Rules of the House for any member
of the House to accept a campaign contribution during the period beginning
thirty (30) days before and ending thirty (30) days after any regular session
of the General Assembly. If there is an extended recess of the General
Assembly, the period shall end thirty (30) days after the beginning of the
recess. It shall also be a violation of the Rules of the House for any member
of the House to accept a campaign contribution during any extended session of
the General Assembly or during any special session of the General Assembly.
109. All Roll Call votes on bills, emergency clauses on bills,
resolutions, and amendments in the House of Representatives shall be entered
by the House into the General Assembly’s Internet web site.
110.(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions 110.(a)(2) and (c) of
this section, the House of Representatives, when in session, shall recess on
January 20 of any year in which the inauguration of an individual to the
office of President of the United States is scheduled to occur.
(2) If the inauguration of an individual to the office of
President of the United States is scheduled to occur on January 21 of any
year, the House of Representatives shall recess on that date rather than
January 20.
(b) The House of Representatives shall recess without regard to the
party affiliation of the individual scheduled for inauguration as President
of the United States.
(c) This section shall not apply if a recess under this section would
occur on a date the House of Representatives shall recess in observance of
the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. under Arkansas Code § 10-2-128.
111. Eligibility, Qualifications, and Removal of Members of the House
of Representatives. (Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 12; and other
applicable constitutional provisions)
112. Impeachments.
112.(a) The House of Representatives has the sole power of impeachment
under Arkansas Constitution, Article 15, § 2, and shall initiate impeachment
proceedings by filing articles of impeachment in the form of a House
Resolution, co-sponsored by at least thirty-four (34) members. Upon filing
of the impeachment resolution, the Speaker of the House shall refer the
impeachment resolution to committee for the following purposes:
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
(1) To investigate the allegations asserted in the articles of
impeachment; and
(2) To make a recommendation to the House of Representatives as
to whether cause exists to impeach the official that is the subject of the
articles of impeachment.
112.(b) All meetings of the committee to which the articles of
impeachment are referred shall be open to the public. Advance notice shall
be given to the public for all meetings consistent with notice requirements
of other House committee meetings and shall include publication of the agenda
for the meeting.
112.(c) The committee shall adopt rules to govern the proceedings
concerning the issue of impeachment in order to ensure due process,
fundamental fairness, and a thorough investigation, provided that the rules
of the committee are not inconsistent with this rule.
112.(d) The committee shall gather information and may hear testimony
related to the question of whether cause exists to impeach the official that
is the subject of the articles of impeachment.
112.(e)(1) Upon conclusion of its investigation, the committee shall
return its recommendation to the House of Representatives regarding the
resolution containing the articles of impeachment.
(2) The committee by an affirmative vote of a majority of its
membership may offer amendments to the impeachment resolution.
(3) The committee shall submit to the House of Representatives,
along with its recommendation on the resolution, a report regarding its
findings and conclusions. If the recommendation of the committee is not
unanimous, at the request of two (2) members, the members in opposition to
the recommendation of the committee may submit a dissenting report.
(4) The recommendation of the committee, along with the
committee report and any dissenting report, shall be provided to the members
of the House of Representatives no less than three (3) business days prior to
consideration of the impeachment resolution by the House of Representatives.
112.(f) Upon the conclusion of the three (3) business days, the
Speaker of the House shall call the House of Representatives into a meeting
in order to take up consideration of the impeachment resolution and the
recommendation of the committee.
112.(g) Passage of the impeachment resolution shall require an
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the House of
Representatives. The vote shall be by roll call.

ADDENDUM
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
COMMITTEE CHAIRPERSONS MANUAL
AND
HOUSE COMMITTEE RULES

A committee chairperson is a member appointed by the Speaker of the House to
function as the parliamentary head of a standing, select, special or joint
committee.

1) The chairperson (or vice chairperson in his or her absence) shall call
the committee to order at the appointed time.

2) The presider shall determine a quorum present either by declaration,
without objection, or by calling the roll (for quorum purposes only a roll
call will be required if there is one objection by a committee member to the
declaration of the presence of a quorum).

3) The presider shall maintain order of the committee meeting.

4) The presider shall decide all questions of order subject to appeal to the
Speaker of the House who may refer the question to the Rules Committee whose
decision may be appealed to the full House.

5) The presider shall supervise and direct the staff of the committee.

6) The presider shall prepare, or supervise the preparation of, and sign all
reports of the committee and submit them to the full House.

House Rule 55.(b) and 55.(c)
55.(b) All committees shall consider the bills, resolutions,
amendments, petitions, and memorials referred to them and make one of the
following reports in writing to the House:
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
55.(b)(1) That a bill, resolution, petition or memorial “do pass”;
55.(b)(2) That a bill, resolution, petition or memorial “do not pass”,
in which event the measure shall not be considered unless the vote is
expunged;
55.(b)(3) That a bill, resolution, petition or memorial “do pass as
amended”.
55.(c) No bill, resolution, petition or memorial shall be acted upon
by the House without a “do pass” or a “do pass as amended” recommendation.
No bills shall be placed on the non-controversial calendar or deemed to be
non-controversial in any way unless a motion is adopted in the committee to
which the bill was referred. With a quorum present, the motion is considered
adopted if there are no negative votes.

7) A quorum (one more than half the total membership of the committee) must
be present to transact official House committee business.

(House Rule 66) No committee shall transact business without a quorum (a
majority of the committee membership present). All final action on bills or
resolutions, and on proposed amendments to bills or resolutions, shall be
decided by a majority vote of the total membership of the committee.
Provided, however, that the Speaker of the House shall not be included for
the purpose of determining what is a majority of a standing committee, unless
present at the time of the vote. A member of the committee must be present
at the time of the vote for his or her vote to be counted on any matter
considered by the committee (no pairs, no proxies).

8) (House Rule 54. (c)(2)) The rules or proceedings of the House of
Representatives shall be observed in all select committees, standing
committees, and subcommittees of the House so far as they may be applicable.

The precedence of motions so far as they are applicable shall be as listed in
House Rule 19(a) – (q):

(House Rule 19) When a question is under debate, motions shall have
precedence in the following order (the request for a quorum call is always in
order; the chairperson is not compelled to accept any motion):
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
19(a) To fix the time to which the House will adjourn (non-debatable)
(majority of a quorum);
19(a)(1) (A majority of a quorum is a majority of those voting when at least
a majority of the members are present and voting);
19(b) To adjourn (non-debatable) (majority of a quorum);
19(c) To take a recess (non-debatable) (majority of a quorum);
19(d) Postpone temporarily; lay on the table (non-debatable) (majority of a
quorum) To take from the table (non-debatable) (majority of a quorum) (when
the motion to take from the table is adopted, the proposition takes the same
position it held when the motion to lay on the table was adopted);
19(e) Immediate consideration (non-debatable) (2/3 of a quorum);
19(f) Previous question (non-debatable) (5 seconds) (majority of a quorum);
19(g) Limit or extend debate (non-debatable) (2/3 of a quorum);
19(h) To expunge (debatable) (2/3 of membership) (67);
19(i) Postpone to a day certain (debatable) (majority of a quorum);
19(j) Committee of the Whole, go into (non-debatable) (majority of a
quorum);
19(k) Refer (debatable) (majority of a quorum);
19(l) Amend (debatable) (majority of a quorum);
19.(m) Postpone indefinitely (debatable) (majority of membership);
19.(n) Take out of proper order (non-debatable) (2/3 of a quorum);
19.(o) Special order of business (debatable) (2/3 of a quorum); and
19.(p) To suspend the rules (non-debatable) (2/3 of a quorum).

9) (House Rule 60(a)) All committee and subcommittee meetings including but
not limited to hearings at which public testimony is to be taken, (normally
called “public hearings”) shall be open to the public (Art. V, Sec. 13) and
shall be scheduled at least eighteen (18) hours in advance; agendas of bills,
resolutions, and other proposals to be considered at such meetings shall be
posted in a designated place at least eighteen (18) hours in advance; but in
case of an emergency, a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the membership of the
committee may bring bills or resolutions up for consideration upon notice of
not less than two (2) hours.

10) (House Rule 60(b)) Special meetings of a standing committee may be
called by the chairperson of the committee or by a majority of the members of
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
the committee for conducting any business of the committee; provided, a
special meeting of the committee may not conflict with regularly scheduled
meetings of any standing committee; provided further, special meetings shall
be subject to the same procedures regarding the publishing of agendas and
notices of meetings that apply to regular standing committee meetings.

11) (House Rule 61(a)) All persons wishing to offer testimony to a
committee hearing shall be given a reasonable opportunity to do so as
determined by a majority of the committee. An oral or written statement
shall not be a prerequisite to offer testimony before a committee.

12) (House Rule 63) No committee shall sit while the House is in session
except the Committee on Rules or a Conference Committee, which shall notify
the House.

13) (House Rule 66(a)) A bill, resolution or amendment in a House
committee, having been rejected twice, shall not be placed on the committee
agenda again or considered again during the same legislative session unless
the vote is expunged (two-thirds of the membership of the committee). The
motion to expunge shall be placed on the committee agenda, by a committee
member, and placed at the bottom of the active list. A bill or resolution may
be amended before a second consideration; but, unless expunged, even an
amended bill having failed twice shall not be placed on the agenda or
considered. Notice of reconsideration not permitted in committee.

14) (House Rule 47(a)) When a bill or resolution is under consideration,
amendments shall be in order. Upon adoption, amendments shall become a part
of the bill or resolution. Amendments to amendments may not be offered. All
amendments offered before the House or one of its committees must be
typewritten on an approved amendment form and signed by the sponsor. All
amendments shall be attached to the original bill or resolution, numbered by
the Bill Clerk, and shall be placed upon the members’ desks before being
acted upon by the House.

(House Rule 38(e)) All amendments shall be entered on a separate sheet of
paper noting the line or lines to be changed and the words to be deleted or
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
inserted.

15) (House Rule 68) No bill or resolution shall be introduced with a
committee as the author of said bill or resolution unless that committee has
voted unanimously to sponsor the bill or resolution.

16) (House Rule 69) Committee Records and Reports
69(a) The chairperson of each committee of the House shall keep or cause to
be kept a separate record for each committee meeting in which there shall be
entered:
(1) The time and place of each hearing and each meeting of the committee.
(2) The number and title of the bill or resolution with one of the following
three recommendations: “do pass”, “do pass as amended”, or “do not pass”. If
a committee recommends a bill or resolution “do pass as amended” and any of
the amendments recommended by the committee are not adopted on the floor, the
bill or resolution shall be re-referred to the same committee for further
consideration and recommendation.
(3) A summary of each bill or resolution's major provisions which may be
several paragraphs in length in case of major bills or resolutions or simply
the title of the bill or resolution in the case of minor bills or
resolutions.
(4) The reason for the committee’s action on the bill or resolution,
including a brief minority report, if requested by any two (2) committee
members.
(5) A record of how every member voted on each bill or resolution when
action is taken by the committee, including votes on a motion to postpone
consideration on the bill or resolution and a recorded vote on any other
motion, if requested by any two (2) committee members.
(6) A list of all people testifying before a committee on each bill or
resolution, the interest that they represent, and an indication of their
position on the bill or resolution.

17) (House Rule 69(b)) Such records for each separate committee meeting
shall be approved by the chairperson before the expiration of a seven (7) day
period, with the exception of those records referred to in (a)(1) and (2),
hereinabove which shall be filed immediately with the Clerk of the House.
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001

18) (House Rule 24 part) When a question is raised about the proper
referral of a bill or resolution to committee, if the Speaker admits error in
the referral of the bill or resolution to a committee, the bill or resolution
may be re-referred by a majority vote of a quorum; however, if the Speaker
does not admit error in the referral of the bill or resolution to committee,
the bill or resolution may only be re-referred by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of
a quorum. When a bill or resolution is re-referred to a committee, any
previous committee recommendation is automatically stripped from the bill or
resolution. When a motion is under consideration, only two (2) substitutes
to that motion shall be in order. Only a motion applicable to the main
motion and of a higher precedence upon recognition may be substituted for the
motion under consideration. A substitute to the third degree shall not be in
order. Unless specified otherwise by the presenter of the motion at the time
the motion is made, a substitute motion shall apply to the main motion.

19) (House Rule 55 (a)) House Committee Staff will automatically and
without delay place all bills or resolutions referred to the committees on
the committee agendas. Staff will notify the sponsor of bills or resolutions
assigned to committee. Referred bills shall be placed on the committee’s
active agenda in the order they are read across the desk on the House Floor.
A bill shall not be placed on a committee agenda until the second calendar
day following the initial filing of the bill. When an active agenda is
established in a committee and bills from that agenda are not placed on the
deferred list and if the bills are passed over, they are placed at the bottom
of the list of the day’s active agenda.

20) After a bill or resolution has appeared on the committee agenda and has
been called up for consideration by the committee and the sponsor of the bill
or resolution or a representative is not present to present the bill or
resolution, the bill or resolution will be placed on the active agenda two
(2) additional times, but will be placed at the bottom of the active agenda.

21) The sponsor may request a bill or resolution be moved to a deferred list
of bills and resolutions. A bill or resolution passed over after appearing
on three (3) committee agendas shall be moved to the deferred list. Sponsor
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
requests to move bills or resolutions from the deferred list to the active
agenda must be made by 2:30 p.m. two (2) days prior to the scheduled
committee meeting. Bills or resolutions moved from the deferred list to the
active agenda shall be listed at the bottom of the active agenda. Bills or
resolutions on the deferred list may be moved to the active calendar as
provided by rule for a total of three (3) times only. A suspension of this
rule by the committee (two-thirds of a quorum) will be required for each
transfer of any bill or resolution having been moved three (3) times
previously.

22) Bills or resolutions suggested as non-controversial will be considered
before consideration of controversial bills or resolutions on the agenda.
The objection of one (1) committee member to the consideration of a bill or
resolution as non-controversial will automatically keep the bill or
resolution from being considered as being non-controversial. Even though a
bill or resolution has been considered as non-controversial, it will be
necessary after a “do pass” or “do pass as amended” recommendation that a
motion be made and there be unanimous consent of no less than a quorum of the
committee for a bill or resolution to be eligible to be placed on the House
non-controversial calendar.

23) If a bill or resolution is discussed by a committee at a meeting, but is
not voted on because of time limitations or because the vote is deferred to
the next meeting, the bill or resolution will not lose its order on the
agenda and will not be counted as having been considered.

24) The author/sponsor of a bill or resolution may make a presentation for
his or her bill or resolution and may elect at that time to respond to
questions from the committee members. Following the initial presentation,
non-legislative---non-committee members will be allowed to alternately speak
against and for the bill or resolution. A procedural motion made by a member
of the committee and adopted by the committee to limit or end debate will be
allowed to govern non-legislative--non-committee members' discussions. At the
conclusion of the non-legislative--non-committee member proponent and
opponent presentations, the sponsor may return to the podium and may elect to
field questions from the committee members. Those questions should be
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
limited to requests for clarification or the securing of information.
Questions that are rhetorically offered and are dilatory for the effect of
debate are discouraged. At this point, the chair will entertain motions from
committee members only. For disposition of a proposition in a House
Committee, procedural motions (limit debate, immediate consideration, etc.)
are allowed only following a main motion (do pass, do not pass, do pass as
amended, etc.). Discussion from that point forward is limited to committee
members for and against the motion, if debatable, in alternating fashion. If
immediate consideration is not adopted and if debate has not been limited and
time has not expired, the sponsor of the motion will be allowed to close for
his or her motion. During the closing, the sponsor of the motion may elect
to field questions from committee members. At the conclusion of these
presentations, a vote will be taken on the motion properly before the
committee.

25) As determined by the presider courtesy may be extended to General
Assembly members who are non-committee members who need to return to their
own committee meetings.

26) (House Rule 66) Eleven (11) members of a standing committee constitute
a committee quorum with the Speaker present if he or she is a member of the
committee and ten (10) members when the Speaker is not present. A committee
recommendation of a bill or resolution will require these same numbers.

27) Smoking is prohibited in the committee rooms and all adjoining rooms.

28) (House Rule 69(a)(5)) A roll call vote will be required if requested by
any two (2) committee members, except for a quorum call which may be
requested by one (1) member. The request for a quorum call is always in
order.

29) When a roll call is required, the roll will be called by seniority with
the vice chairperson being called next to last and the chairperson last. For
a member's vote to be counted and recorded, he or she must vote "yes", "no"
or "present".

01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
30) During a roll call vote, when a member’s name has been called twice and
he or she does not respond, or when a member passes, they will not be allowed
to vote at a later time on the current issue before the committee.

31) No seconds are required during the legislative process except those that
are explicit in the rules, (roll call, previous question, sound the ballot,
etc.)

32) (House Rule 38(r)) "Fiscal impact statement" means a realistic
statement of the estimated financial cost of implementing or complying with a
proposed law regarding:
(1) Municipalities;
(2) Counties;
(3) Education, as related to the State of Arkansas and local school
districts grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12);
(4) Corrections, if imposing new or additional costs and restrictions
on inmate population patterns or affecting programs or services of the
Department of Correction;
(5) Lottery, if amending Arkansas Code, Title 23, Chapter 115, or
imposing a new or increased cost to the Office of the Arkansas Lottery or a
lottery;
(6) Health benefit plans, if imposing a new or increased cost
obligation for health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an
entity of the state Imposing a new or increased cost on the State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program; or
(7) New or existing scholarships to be funded with net proceeds from
the state lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund Account, as applicable
.

33) (House Rule 38(s)) When any House or Senate bill or resolution
requiring an expenditure of public funds or otherwise imposing a new or
increased cost obligation is pending before any committee of the House of
Representatives, any member of the committee may request that a fiscal impact
statement for such bill or resolution be placed on the desk of each member of
the committee before the bill or resolution is called up for final action in
the committee. If such request is made, the chairperson of the committee
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
shall refer the bill or resolution to the appropriate state agency or to the
legislative staff for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement, to be
returned to the committee in writing not later than five (5) days from the
date of the request.

34) (House Rule 38(u)) Fiscal impact statements shall be made available to
House Committees:
(1) At least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for final
action in the House Committee during a regular legislative session or fiscal
session of the General Assembly; and
(2) At least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for final
action in the House Committee during a special session of the General
Assembly.
Fiscal impact statements shall be made available to the full House of
Representatives at least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for
third reading and final action in the House of Representatives.

35) (House Rule 38(v)) (1) Except for bills imposing a new or increased
cost obligation for health benefit plans on an entity of the state on the
State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program or bills regarding
new or existing scholarships to be funded with net proceeds from the state
lottery or the Higher Education Grants Fund, failure of the sponsor of a bill
or resolution to provide the fiscal impact statement required in this rule
shall not prohibit the consideration of it in the committee to which referred
or on the floor of the House of Representatives, if no objection to it is
made at the time such action is taken.
(2) A bill filed in the House of Representatives that will impose a new
or increased cost obligation for health benefit plans, including pharmacy
benefits, on an entity of the state on the State and Public School Life and
Health Insurance Program shall:
(A) Have a fiscal impact statement attached to the bill prepared
and filed with the chair of the committee to which the bill is referred; and
(B) Not be taken up by the committee to which the bill is
referred until a fiscal impact statement is provided to the chair of the
committee.
(3)(A) Any bill filed with the House of Representatives that creates a
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
new scholarship to be funded with net proceeds from the state lottery or the
Higher Education Grants Fund Account, as applicable, or affects an existing
scholarship that is funded with net proceeds from the state lottery or the
Higher Education Grants Fund Account, as applicable, shall:
(i) Have a lottery fiscal impact statement
attached to it that is in the form set forth in Arkansas Code § 6-85-502; and
(ii) Not be taken up by the House Committee on
Education and the Senate Committee on Education meeting jointly, until a
lottery fiscal impact statement is attached.

TRACKING ITEM 24
1. “The next item on the Committee’s agenda is HB/SB _____.”
2. “Sen./Rep. _____, you are recognized to present HB/SB _____.”
3. Presentation of bill by sponsor. The sponsor may respond to questions
from committee members.
a. If there are amendments, recognize amendment sponsor(s) to present
amendment(s).
b. To consider amendment(s), use same procedure listed below for
consideration of bill(s). (Items 4 – 9)
c. Declare disposition of amendment(s).
d. Continue with bill as amended or unamended (back to Item 4).
4. Go to list of citizen proponents and opponents or ask “Is there anyone in
the audience that desires to speak for or against the bill?” Recognition of
citizens for discussion, alternating speakers in support and in opposition.
5. A procedural motion made by a member of the Committee and adopted by the
Committee to limit or end debate will be allowed to govern non-legislative,
non-Committee members' (citizen) discussion.
6. Upon completion of public commentary, recognize the sponsor for
questions, then move to committee discussion and motions.
7. Ask “What is the pleasure of the Committee?”
Motions (after recognition and the motion by a committee member
only)
a. “Rep. _____, would you like to explain your motion?”
b. Recognize committee members for questions/discussion.
c. In discussion, alternate between those supporting and those
opposing the motion.
01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HR1001
d. A procedural motion made by a member of the Committee and adopted
by the Committee to limit or end debate (immediate consideration) will be
allowed to govern the legislative members' discussion.
e. Recognize the member making the motion to close for the motion if
debate has not been limited and time has not expired (proponents may save
some time for member to close).
f. Repeat until all motions are resolved, and action on the bill is
complete.
8. “The motion before the committee is __________. All of those in support
of the motion indicate so by saying ‘aye’; those opposed, ‘no’.”
9. The motion passes/fails, and state the disposition of the bill.
10. Roll call. (If requested by two or more members) Ask the committee
staff person to call the roll, then state the disposition of the bill.

/s/Evans





















01-16-2025 14:00:54 JET019